Washington statutes.
RCW 19.146.218

Informal settlement of complaints or enforcement actions—Director's discretion.

Except to the extent prohibited by another statute, the director may engage in informal settlement of complaints or enforcement actions including, but not limited to, payment to the department for purposes of financial literacy and education programs authorized under RCW 43.320.150. If any person subject to this chapter makes a payment to the department under this section, the person may not advertise such payment.

[ 2012 c 17 s 13.]